Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.110

Modification under chapter 11.97 RCW—How constituted.

This chapter is declared to be of similar import to the uniform trustees' accounting act. Any modification under chapter 11.97 RCW, including waiver, of the requirements of this chapter in any will, deed, or agreement heretofore or hereafter executed shall be given effect whether the waiver refers to the uniform trustees' accounting act by name or other reference or to any other act of like or similar import.

[ 1985 c 30 s 105. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 138; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.110; prior: 1951 c 226 s 12. Formerly RCW 30.30.110.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.